Utah statutes.
35A-8-1102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Account" means the Methamphetamine Housing Reconstruction and Rehabilitation Account created in Section 35A-8-1103.

(2)  "Contaminated by methamphetamine" means that a residence is:

(a)  polluted by hazardous materials as a result of the use, production, or presence of methamphetamine in excess of decontamination standards adopted by the Department of Health under Section 26-51-201; and

(b)  placed on a contamination list by a local health department in accordance with Section 19-6-903.

(3)  "Qualified housing organization" means an affiliate located in this state of an organization if that organization:

(a)  is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  operates on a worldwide basis;

(c)  has the primary purposes of:

(i)  constructing, reconstructing, and rehabilitating residences that are:

(A)  sold to low-income persons selected by the organization in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section 35A-8-1103; and

(B)  financed with loans that are not subject to interest as determined by the organization in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section 35A-8-1103; and

(ii)  purchasing property upon which residences described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) are constructed, reconstructed, or rehabilitated;

(d)  expends a portion of the repayment on the loans described in Subsection (3)(c)(i)(B) to finance:

(i)  the construction, reconstruction, and rehabilitation of residences described in Subsection (3)(c)(i); and

(ii)  the purchase of property upon which residences described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) are constructed, reconstructed, or rehabilitated; and

(e)  has built more than 250,000 residences in total.

(4) (a)  "Residence" means a single-family residence.

(b)  "Residence" includes:

(i)  a condominium;

(ii)  a garage;

(iii)  real property appurtenant to a residence:

(A)  as determined by the division in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section 35A-8-1103; and

(B)  if that real property is contaminated by methamphetamine;

(iv)  a shed; or

(v)  a town home.

(c)  "Residence" does not include:

(i)  an apartment or other rental unit as determined by the division in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section 35A-8-1103; or

(ii)  an outbuilding except for a garage or shed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

